btlx.noun.case.lexd
PATTERNS
NounAbs [<n>:] Absolutive
NounObl [<n>:] (Ergative|Dative)
NounObl[gen1] [<n>:] Genetive1
NounObl[-gen1] [<n>:] Genetive2

LEXICON NounAbs1type[gen1]
има #отец

LEXICON NounAbsOthers
кӀату #конь
гьуркьа #орех
ила #мать
xъуча #книга

PATTERN NounAbs
NounAbs1type[gen1]|NounAbsOthers

LEXICON NounObl
кӀату:кӀату #конь
гьуркьа:гьуркьа #орех
ила:илу #мать
има:иму[gen1] #отец
xъуча:xъучу #книга

LEXICON Absolutive
<abs>:

LEXICON Ergative
<erg>:ди

LEXICON Dative
<dat>:и
<dat>:ий

LEXICON Genetive2
<gen>:лъи

PATTERN Genetive1
Gen1 CL

LEXICON Gen1
<gen>:

LEXICON CL
<m>:в
<f>:й
<nl>:б
<nl>:м
<an>:р
<an>:л
<an>:н
<inan>:б
<inan>:м
